Florida, session 2026, HB1509.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 474.217, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
474.217 Licensure by endorsement.—
(1) The department shall issue a license by endorsement to
any applicant who, upon applying to the department and remitting
a fee set by the board, demonstrates to the board that she or
he:
(a) Has demonstrated, in a manner designated by rule of
the board, knowledge of the laws and rules governing the
practice of veterinary medicine in this state; and
(b)1. Holds, and has held for the 3 years immediately
preceding the application for licensure, a valid, active license
in good standing to practice veterinary medicine in another
state of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a
territory of the United States, provided that the applicant has
successfully completed a state, regional, national, or other
examination that is equivalent to or more stringent than the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1509 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 1509 2026 Legislature
examination required by the board; or
2. Meets the qualifications of s. 474.207(2)(b) and has
successfully completed a state, regional, national, or other
examination which is equivalent to or more stringent than the
examination given by the department and has passed the board's
clinical competency examination or another clinical competency
examination specified by rule of the board.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1509 -00-er